Utah statutes.
26A-1-113.   Right of entry to regulated premises by representatives for inspection.

(1)  Upon presenting proper identification, authorized representatives of local health departments may enter upon the premises of properties regulated by local health departments to perform routine inspections to insure compliance with rules, standards, regulations, and ordinances as adopted by the Departments of Health and Environmental Quality, local boards of health, county or municipal governing bodies, or administered by the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing under Title 15A, Chapter 1, Part 2, State Construction Code Administration Act.

(2)  Section 58-56-9 does not apply to health inspectors acting under this section.

(3)  This section does not authorize local health departments to inspect private dwellings.

